District of Columbia statutes.
22-1316

Repealed

Interference with foreign diplomatic and consular offices, officers, and property — Penalties; exception.

Repealed.

May 7, 1988, D.C. Law 7-105, § 2, 35 DCR 728
1981 Ed., § 22-1116.